Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB942.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(b) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 303. Game Commission officers and employees.* * *(b) Status.--[Except](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) and except for the director, all personnel shall be employed in accordance with the classification and compensation plans of the Commonwealth and regulations of the commission.(2) Each full-time officer whose duty it is to enforce this title shall be classified in the same manner as members of the Pennsylvania State Police for purposes of 1234567891011121314151617 compensation.* * *Section 2. This act shall apply to compensation earned on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0942PN1008 - 2 - 12345